Vermont, session 2025-2026, H950.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Collective Bargaining Agreements; Fiscal Years 2027 and 2028 * * *
Sec. 1. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS; FISCAL YEARS
2027 AND 2028
(a) Fiscal year 2027. This act fully funds the first year of the collective
bargaining agreements between the State and the Vermont State Employees’
Association and the State and the Vermont Troopers’ Association for the
period of July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027. The collective bargaining
agreements for most classified employees provide in fiscal year 2027 an
average 1.9 percent step increase and a 2 percent across-the-board increase on
July 12, 2026, and a 2 percent across-the-board increase on January 10, 2027,
for a total of a 5.9 percent increase.
VT LEG #387897 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.950
2026 Page 2 of 26
(b) Fiscal year 2028. This act fully funds the second year of the collective
bargaining agreements between the State and the Vermont State Employees’
Association and the State and the Vermont Troopers’ Association for the
period of July 1, 2027, through June 30, 2028. The collective bargaining
agreements for most classified employees provide in fiscal year 2028 an
average 1.9 percent step increase and a 3.0 percent across-the-board increase
for a total of a 4.9 percent increase.
* * * Exempt Employees; Fiscal Years 2027 and 2028 * * *
Sec. 2. EXEMPT EMPLOYEES; PERMITTED SALARY INCREASES;
FISCAL YEARS 2027 AND 2028
(a) Fiscal year 2027. The Executive, Judicial, and Legislative Branches
may extend the fiscal year 2027 provisions of the collective bargaining
agreements that are funded by this act to employees not covered by the
bargaining agreements as they determine to be appropriate and in accordance
with the appropriations provided to each branch.
(b) Fiscal year 2028. The Executive, Judicial, and Legislative Branches
may extend the fiscal year 2028 provisions of the collective bargaining
agreements that are funded by this act to employees not covered by the
bargaining agreements as they determine to be appropriate and in accordance
with the appropriations provided to each branch.
VT LEG #387897 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.950
2026 Page 3 of 26
Sec. 3. EXECUTIVE BRANCH; EXEMPT AGENCY AND
DEPARTMENT HEADS, DEPUTIES, AND EXECUTIVE
ASSISTANTS; ANNUAL SALARY ADJUSTMENT AND SPECIAL
SALARY INCREASE OR BONUS
(a) Fiscal year 2027. For purposes of determining annual salary
adjustments, special salary increases, and bonuses under 32 V.S.A. §§ 1003(b)
and 1020(b), “the average rate of adjustment available to most classified
employees under the collective bargaining agreement” shall be, in fiscal year
2027, 5.9 percent.
(b) Fiscal year 2028. For purposes of determining annual salary
adjustments, special salary increases, and bonuses under 32 V.S.A. §§ 1003(b)
and 1020(b), “the average rate of adjustment available to most classified
employees under the collective bargaining agreement” shall be, in fiscal year
2028, 4.9 percent.
* * * Executive Branch; Miscellaneous Statutory Salaries;
Fiscal Years 2027 and 2028 * * *
Sec. 4. 32 V.S.A. § 1003 is amended to read:
§ 1003. STATE OFFICERS
(a) Each elective officer of the Executive Department is entitled to an
annual salary as follows:
VT LEG #387897 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.950
2026 Page 4 of 26
Annual Annual
Salary Salary
as of as of
July 14, July 13,
2024 2025
(1) Governor $222,371 $234,379
(2) Lieutenant Governor $94,392 $99,489
(3) Secretary of State $141,003 $148,617
(4) State Treasurer $141,003 $148,617
(5) Auditor of Accounts $141,003 $148,617
(6) Attorney General $168,837 $177,954
Annual Annual Annual
Salary Salary Salary
as of as of as of
July 12, January 10, July 11,
2026 2027 2027
(1) Governor $243,520 $248,390 $260,561
(2) Lieutenant Governor $103,369 $105,436 $110,602
(3) Secretary of State $154,413 $157,501 $165,219
(4) State Treasurer $154,413 $157,501 $165,219
(5) Auditor of Accounts $154,413 $157,501 $165,219
VT LEG #387897 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.950
2026 Page 5 of 26
(6) Attorney General $184,894 $188,592 $197,833
(b) The Governor may appoint each officer of the Executive Branch listed
in this subsection at a starting salary ranging from the base salary stated for
that position to a salary that does not exceed the maximum salary unless
otherwise authorized by this subsection. The maximum salary for each
appointive officer shall be 50 percent above the base salary. Annually, the
Governor may grant to each of those officers an annual salary adjustment
subject to the maximum salary. The annual salary adjustment granted to
officers under this subsection shall not exceed the average rate of adjustment
available to most classified employees under the collective bargaining
agreement then in effect. In addition to the annual salary adjustment specified
in this subsection, the Governor may grant a special salary increase subject to
the maximum salary, or a bonus, to any officer listed in this subsection whose
job duties have significantly increased, or whose contributions to the State in
the preceding year are deemed especially significant. Special salary increases
or bonuses granted to any individual shall not exceed the average rate of
adjustment available to most classified employees under the collective
bargaining agreement then in effect.
(1) Heads of the following Departments and Agencies:
Base Base
Salary Salary
VT LEG #387897 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.950
2026 Page 6 of 26
as of as of
July 14, July 13,
2024 2025
(A) Administration $134,466 $141,727
(B) Agriculture,
Food and
Markets $134,466 $141,727
(C) Financial
Regulation $125,706 $132,494
(D) Buildings and
General Services $125,706 $132,494
(E) Children and
Families $125,706 $132,494
(F) Commerce and
Community
Development $134,466 $141,727
(G) Corrections $125,706 $132,494
(H) Defender
General $125,706 $132,494
(I) Disabilities,
Aging, and
VT LEG #387897 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.950
2026 Page 7 of 26
Independent
Living $125,706 $132,494
(J) Economic
Development $114,031 $120,189
(K) Education $134,466 $141,727
(L) Environmental
Conservation $125,706 $132,494
(M) Finance and
Management $125,706 $132,494
(N) Fish and
Wildlife $114,031 $120,189
(O) Forests, Parks
and Recreation $114,031 $120,189
(P) Health $125,706 $132,494
(Q) Housing and
Community
Development $114,031 $120,189
(R) Human
Resources $125,706 $132,494
(S) Human Services $134,466 $141,727
(T) Digital Services $134,466 $141,727
VT LEG #387897 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.950
2026 Page 8 of 26
(U) Labor $125,706 $132,494
(V) Libraries $114,031 $120,189
(W) Liquor and
Lottery $114,031 $120,189
(X) [Repealed.]
(Y) Mental Health $125,706 $132,494
(Z) Military $125,706 $132,494
(AA) Motor
Vehicles $114,031 $120,189
(BB) Natural
Resources $134,466 $141,727
(CC) Land Use Review
Board Chair $114,031 $120,189
(DD) Public Safety $125,706 $132,494
(EE) Public Service $125,706 $132,494
(FF) Taxes $125,706 $132,494
(GG) Tourism and
Marketing $114,031 $120,189
(HH) Transportation $134,466 $141,727
(II) Vermont Health
Access $125,706 $132,494
VT LEG #387897 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.950
2026 Page 9 of 26
(JJ) Veterans’ Home $125,706 $132,494
Base Base Base
Salary Salary Salary
as of as of as of
July 12, January 10, July 11,
2026 2027 2027
(A) Administration $147,254 $150,199 $157,559
(B) Agriculture,
Food and
Markets $147,254 $150,199 $157,559
(C) Financial
Regulation $137,661 $140,414 $147,294
(D) Buildings and
General Services $137,661 $140,414 $147,294
(E) Children and
Families $137,661 $140,414 $147,294
(F) Commerce and
Community
Development $147,254 $150,199 $157,559
(G) Corrections $137,661 $140,414 $147,294
VT LEG #387897 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.950
2026 Page 10 of 26
(H) Defender
General $137,661 $140,414 $147,294
(I) Disabilities,
Aging, and
Independent
Living $137,661 $140,414 $147,294
(J) Economic
Development $124,876 $127,374 $133,615
(K) Education $147,254 $150,199 $157,559
(L) Environmental
Conservation $137,661 $140,414 $147,294
(M) Finance and
Management $137,661 $140,414 $147,294
(N) Fish and
Wildlife $124,876 $127,374 $133,615
(O) Forests, Parks
and Recreation $124,876 $127,374 $133,615
(P) Health $137,661 $140,414 $147,294
(Q) Housing and
Community
Development $124,876 $127,374 $133,615
VT LEG #387897 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.950
2026 Page 11 of 26
(R) Human
Resources $137,661 $140,414 $147,294
(S) Human Services $147,254 $150,199 $157,559
(T) Digital Services $147,254 $150,199 $157,559
(U) Labor $137,661 $140,414 $147,294
(V) Libraries $124,876 $127,374 $133,615
(W) Liquor and
Lottery $124,876 $127,374 $133,615
(X) [Repealed.]
(Y) Mental Health $137,661 $140,414 $147,294
(Z) Military $137,661 $140,414 $147,294
(AA) Motor
Vehicles $124,876 $127,374 $133,615
(BB) Natural
Resources $147,254 $150,199 $157,559
(CC) Land Use Review
Board Chair $124,876 $127,374 $133,615
(DD) Public Safety $137,661 $140,414 $147,294
(EE) Public Service $137,661 $140,414 $147,294
(FF) Taxes $137,661 $140,414 $147,294
VT LEG #387897 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.950
2026 Page 12 of 26
(GG) Tourism and
Marketing $124,876 $127,374 $133,615
(HH) Transportation $147,254 $150,199 $157,559
(II) Vermont Health
Access $137,661 $140,414 $147,294
(JJ) Veterans’ Home $137,661 $140,414 $147,294
(2) [Repealed.]
(3) If the Chair of the Land Use Review Board is employed on less than
a full-time basis, the hiring and salary maximums for that position shall be
reduced proportionately.
(4) When a permanent employee is appointed to an exempt position, the
Governor may authorize such employee to retain the present salary even
though it is in excess of any salary maximum provided in statute.
* * *
(d) Notwithstanding the maximum salary established in subsection (b) of
this section, the Defender General shall not receive compensation in excess of
the compensation established for the Attorney General in this section.
(e) Notwithstanding the maximum salary established in subsection (b) of
this section, the maximum salary for the Commissioner of Health shall not
exceed 100 percent above the base salary for this position.
VT LEG #387897 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.950
2026 Page 13 of 26
* * * Judicial Branch; Statutory Salaries; Fiscal Years 2027 and 2028 * * *
Sec. 5. 32 V.S.A. § 1003(c) is amended to read:
(c) The officers of the Judicial Branch named in this subsection shall be
entitled to annual salaries as follows:
Annual Annual
Salary Salary
as of as of
July 14, July 13,
2024 2025
(1) Chief Justice of
Supreme Court $214,024 $225,581
(2) Each Associate
Justice $204,264 $215,294
(3) Chief Superior
Judge $204,264 $215,294
(4) Each Superior
Judge $194,185 $204,671
(5) [Repealed.]
(6) Each
Magistrate $146,413 $154,319
VT LEG #387897 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.950
2026 Page 14 of 26
(7) Each Judicial
Bureau hearing
officer $146,413 $154,319
Annual Annual Annual
Salary Salary Salary
as of as of as of
July 12, January 10, July 11,
2026 2027 2027
(1) Chief Justice of
Supreme Court $234,379 $239,067 $250,781
(2) Each Associate
Justice $223,690 $228,164 $239,344
(3) Chief Superior
Judge $223,690 $228,164 $239,344
(4) Each Superior
Judge $212,653 $216,906 $227,534
(5) [Repealed.]
(6) Each
Magistrate $160,337 $163,544 $171,558
VT LEG #387897 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.950
2026 Page 15 of 26
(7) Each Judicial
Bureau hearing
officer $160,337 $163,544 $171,558
Sec. 6. 32 V.S.A. § 1141 is amended to read:
§ 1141. ASSISTANT JUDGES
(a)(1) Each assistant judge of the Superior Court shall be entitled to receive
compensation in the amount of $224.47 a day as of July 14, 2024 and $236.59
a day as of July 13, 2025 $245.82 a day as of July 12, 2026, $250.74 a day as
of January 10, 2027, and $263.03 a day as of July 11, 2027, for time spent in
the performance of official duties and necessary expenses as allowed to
classified State employees. Compensation under this section shall be based on
a two-hour minimum and hourly thereafter.
(2)(A) The compensation paid to an assistant judge pursuant to this
section shall be paid by the State except as provided in subdivision (B) of this
subdivision (2).
(B) The compensation paid to an assistant judge pursuant to this
section shall be paid by the county at the State rate established in subdivision
(a)(1) of this section when an assistant judge is sitting with a presiding
Superior judge in the Civil or Family Division of the Superior Court.
VT LEG #387897 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.950
2026 Page 16 of 26
(b) Assistant judges of the Superior Court shall be entitled to receive pay
for such days as they attend court when it is in actual session or during a court
recess when engaged in the special performance of official duties.
Sec. 7. 32 V.S.A. § 1142 is amended to read:
§ 1142. PROBATE JUDGES
(a) The Probate judges in the several Probate Districts shall be entitled to
receive the following annual salaries, which shall be paid by the State in lieu of
all fees or other compensation:
Annual Annual
Salary Salary
as of as of
July 14, July 13,
2024 2025
(1) Addison $76,555 $80,689
(2) Bennington $96,776 $102,002
(3) Caledonia $67,891 $71,557
(4) Chittenden $161,506 $170,227
(5) Essex $18,966 $19,990
(6) Franklin $76,555 $80,689
(7) Grand Isle $18,966 $19,990
(8) Lamoille $53,443 $56,329
VT LEG #387897 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.950
2026 Page 17 of 26
(9) Orange $63,554 $66,986
(10) Orleans $62,110 $65,464
(11) Rutland $137,221 $144,631
(12) Washington $105,441 $111,135
(13) Windham $85,221 $89,823
(14) Windsor $115,555 $121,795
Annual Annual Annual
Salary Salary Salary
as of as of as of
July 12, January 10, July 11,
2026 2027 2027
(1) Addison $83,836 $85,513 $89,703
(2) Bennington $105,980 $108,100 $113,397
(3) Caledonia $74,348 $75,835 $79,551
(4) Chittenden $176,866 $180,403 $189,243
(5) Essex $20,770 $21,185 $22,223
(6) Franklin $83,836 $85,513 $89,703
(7) Grand Isle $20,770 $21,185 $22,223
(8) Lamoille $58,526 $59,697 $62,622
(9) Orange $69,598 $70,990 $74,469
(10) Orleans $68,017 $69,377 $72,776
VT LEG #387897 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.950
2026 Page 18 of 26
(11) Rutland $150,272 $153,277 $160,788
(12) Washington $115,469 $117,778 $123,549
(13) Windham $93,326 $95,193 $99,857
(14) Windsor $126,545 $129,076 $135,401
(b) Probate judges shall be entitled to be paid by the State for their actual
and necessary expenses under the rules pertaining to classified State
employees. The compensation for the Probate judge of the Chittenden District
shall be for full-time service.
(c) All Probate judges, regardless of the number of hours worked annually,
shall be eligible to participate in all employee benefits that are available to
exempt employees of the Judicial Department.
* * * Sheriffs; Statutory Salaries; Fiscal Years 2027 and 2028 * * *
Sec. 8. 32 V.S.A. § 1182 is amended to read:
§ 1182. SHERIFFS
(a) The sheriffs of all counties except Chittenden shall be entitled to receive
salaries in the amount of $104,010.00 as of July 14, 2024 and $109.627.00 as
of July 13, 2025 $113,902.00 as of July 12, 2026, $116,180.00 as of January
10, 2027, and $122,873.00 as of July 11, 2027. The Sheriff of Chittenden
County shall be entitled to an annual salary in the amount of $110,070.00 as of
July 14, 2024 and $116,014.00 as of July 13, 2025 $120,539.00 as of July 12,
VT LEG #387897 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.950
2026 Page 19 of 26
2026, $122,950.00 as of January 10, 2027, and $128,975.00 as of July 11,
2027.
(b) Compensation under subsection (a) of this section shall be reduced by
10 percent for any sheriff who has Level II but not obtained Level III law
enforcement officer certification under 20 V.S.A. § 2358.
* * *
* * * State’s Attorneys; Statutory Salaries; Fiscal Years 2027 and 2028 * * *
Sec. 9. 32 V.S.A. § 1183 is amended to read:
§ 1183. STATE’S ATTORNEYS
(a) The State’s Attorneys shall be entitled to receive annual salaries as
follows:
Annual Annual
Salary Salary
as of as of
July 14, July 13,
2024 2025
(1) Addison County $140,691 $148,288
(2) Bennington
County $140,691 $148,288
(3) Caledonia County $140,691 $148,288
(4) Chittenden County $147,087 $155,030
VT LEG #387897 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.950
2026 Page 20 of 26
(5) Essex County $105,521 $111,219
(6) Franklin County $140,691 $148,288
(7) Grand Isle County $105,521 $111,219
(8) Lamoille County $140,691 $148,288
(9) Orange County $140,691 $148,288
(10) Orleans County $140,691 $148,288
(11) Rutland County $140,691 $148,288
(12) Washington
County $140,691 $148,288
(13) Windham County $140,691 $148,288
(14) Windsor County $140,691 $148,288
Annual Annual Annual
Salary Salary Salary
as of as of as of
July 12, January 10, July 11,
2026 2027 2027
(1) Addison County $154,071 $157,152 $164,852
(2) Bennington
County $154,071 $157,152 $164,852
(3) Caledonia County $154,071 $157,152 $164,852
(4) Chittenden County $161,076 $164,298 $172,349
VT LEG #387897 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.950
2026 Page 21 of 26
(5) Essex County $115,557 $117,868 $123,644
(6) Franklin County $154,071 $157,152 $164,852
(7) Grand Isle County $115,557 $117,868 $123,644
(8) Lamoille County $154,071 $157,152 $164,852
(9) Orange County $154,071 $157,152 $164,852
(10) Orleans County $154,071 $157,152 $164,852
(11) Rutland County $154,071 $157,152 $164,852
(12) Washington
County $154,071 $157,152 $164,852
(13) Windham County $154,071 $157,152 $164,852
(14) Windsor County $154,071 $157,152 $164,852
(b) In settlement of their accounts, the Commissioner of Finance and
Management shall allow the State’s Attorneys the expense of printing briefs in
cases in which the State’s Attorney has represented the State and their
necessary and actual expenses under the rules pertaining to classified State
employees.
* * * Appropriations * * *
Sec. 10. PAY ACT APPROPRIATIONS; FISCAL YEARS 2027 AND
2028
(a) Executive Branch. The first and second years of the two-year
agreements between the State of Vermont and the Vermont State Employees’
VT LEG #387897 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.950
2026 Page 22 of 26
Association for the Defender General, Non-Management, Supervisory, and
Corrections bargaining units, and, for the purpose of appropriation, the State’s
Attorneys’ offices bargaining unit, for the period of July 1, 2026, through June
30, 2028; the collective bargaining agreement with the Vermont Troopers’
Association for the period of July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2028; and salary
increases for employees in the Executive Branch not covered by the bargaining
agreements shall be funded as follows:
(1) Fiscal year 2027.
(A) General Fund. The amount of $23,918,820.00 is appropriated
from the General Fund to the Secretary of Administration for distribution to
departments to fund the fiscal year 2027 collective bargaining agreements and
the requirements of this act.
(B) Transportation Fund. The amount of $3,000,000.00 is
appropriated from the Transportation Fund to the Secretary of Administration
for distribution to the Agency of Transportation and the Department of Public
Safety to fund the fiscal year 2027 collective bargaining agreements and the
requirements of this act.
(C) Other funds. The Administration shall provide additional
spending authority to departments through the existing process of excess
receipts to fund the fiscal year 2027 collective bargaining agreements and the
VT LEG #387897 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.950
2026 Page 23 of 26
requirements of this act. The estimated amounts are $27,184,607.00 from a
special fund, federal funds, and other sources.
(D) Transfers. With due regard to the possible availability of other
funds, for fiscal year 2027, the Secretary of Administration may transfer from
the various appropriations and various funds and from the receipts of the
Liquor Control Board such sums as the Secretary may determine to be
necessary to carry out the purposes of this act to the various agencies supported
by State funds.
(2) Fiscal year 2028.
(A) General Fund. The amount of $24,974,632.00 is appropriated
from the General Fund to the Secretary of Administration for distribution to
departments to fund the fiscal year 2028 collective bargaining agreements and
the requirements of this act.
(B) Transportation Fund. The amount of $3,000,000.00 is
appropriated from the Transportation Fund to the Secretary of Administration
for distribution to the Agency of Transportation and the Department of Public
Safety to fund the fiscal year 2028 collective bargaining agreements and the
requirements of this act.
(C) Other funds. The Administration shall provide additional
spending authority to departments through the existing process of excess
receipts to fund the fiscal year 2028 collective bargaining agreements and the
VT LEG #387897 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.950
2026 Page 24 of 26
requirements of this act. The estimated amounts are $28,362,343.00 from a
special fund, federal funds, and other sources.
(D) Transfers. With due regard to the possible availability of other
funds, for fiscal year 2028, the Secretary of Administration may transfer from
the various appropriations and various funds and from the receipts of the
Liquor Control Board such sums as the Secretary may determine to be
necessary to carry out the purposes of this act to the various agencies supported
by State funds.
(3) This section shall include sufficient funding to ensure administration
of exempt pay plans authorized by 32 V.S.A. § 1020(c).
(b) Judicial Branch.
(1) The Chief Justice of the Vermont Supreme Court may extend the
provisions of the Judiciary’s collective bargaining agreement to Judiciary
employees who are not covered by the bargaining agreement.
(2) Fiscal year 2027. The first year of the two-year agreements between
the State of Vermont and the Vermont State Employees’ Association for the
judicial bargaining unit for the period of July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027,
and salary increases for employees in the Judicial Branch not covered by the
bargaining agreements shall be funded as follows: the amount of
$3,800,867.00 is appropriated from the General Fund and the amount of
VT LEG #387897 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.950
2026 Page 25 of 26
$277,316.00 is provided from other sources to the Judiciary to fund the fiscal
year 2027 collective bargaining agreement and the requirements of this act.
(3) Fiscal year 2028. The second year of the two-year agreements
between the State of Vermont and the Vermont State Employees’ Association
for the judicial bargaining unit for the period of July 1, 2027, through June 30,
2028, and salary increases for employees in the Judicial Branch not covered by
the bargaining agreements shall be funded as follows: the amount of
$2,466,396.00 is appropriated from the General Fund and the amount of
$179,952.00 is provided from other sources to the Judiciary to fund the fiscal
year 2028 collective bargaining agreement and the requirements of this act.
(c) Legislative Branch.
(1) For the period of July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027, the General
Assembly, including all Legislative Branch employees, shall be funded as
follows: the amount of $914,634.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Legislative Branch.
(2) For the period of July 1, 2027, through June 30, 2028, the General
Assembly, including all Legislative Branch employees, shall be funded as
follows: the amount of $778,939.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Legislative Branch.
VT LEG #387897 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.950
2026 Page 26 of 26
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 11. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #387897 v.2